Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Burglary and Criminal Intrusion
(Wyo. 2003); Major v. State, 2004 WY 4, 83 P.3d 468,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2004); Koenig v. State, 2005 WY 135, 121 P.3d 780,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(2005); Gibbs v. State, 2008 WY 79, 187 P.3d 862,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(July 14, 2008); Budder v. State, 2010 WY 123, — P.3d —,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Aug. 31, 2010); Yearout v. State, 2013 WY 133, 311 P.3d 180,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 139

, 2013 WL 5728045 (Oct 22, 2013); Yearout v. State, 2013 WY 133, 311 P.3d 180,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 139

, 2013 WL 5728045 (Oct 22, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For article, “Burglary in Wyoming,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 721 (1997).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Outbuildings or the like as part of “dwelling house,” 43 ALR2d 831.

Gambling or lottery paraphernalia as subject of burglary, 51 ALR2d 1396.

Definition of building or house, 78 ALR2d 778.

Burglary or breaking and entering of motor vehicle, 79 ALR2d 286.

Sufficiency of showing that burglary was committed at night, 82 ALR2d 643.

Breaking and entering of inner door of building as burglary, 43 ALR3d 1147.

Breaking into or taking money or goods from coin-operated machine, 45 ALR3d 1286.

What constitutes “exclusive” possession of stolen goods to support inference of burglary, 51 ALR3d 727.

Entry through partly opened door or window as burglary, 70 ALR3d 881.

Coercion, compulsion, or duress as defense to charge of robbery, larceny, or related crime, 1 ALR4th 481.

Liability of person furnishing, installing or servicing burglary or fire alarm system for burglary or fire loss, 37 ALR4th 47.

Maintainability of burglary charge, where entry into building is made with consent, 58 ALR4th 335.

What is “building” or “house” within burglary or breaking-and-entering statute, 68 ALR4th 425.

Minor's entry into home of parent as sufficient to sustain burglary charge, 17 ALR5th 111.

Use of fraud or trick as “constructive breaking” for purpose of burglary or breaking and entering offense, 17 ALR5th 125.